Maine, session 132, LD1835.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3197 is enacted to read:
§3197. Nonemergency transportation reporting and quality assurance
1. Definitions. As used in this section, section 3198 and section 3199, unless the
context otherwise indicates, the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Broker" means an entity with which the department has contracted to manage,
authorize, coordinate and reimburse the provision of necessary nonemergency
transportation for eligible MaineCare members.
B. "Nonemergency transportation" means transportation services provided to
MaineCare members through one of the state-designated transportation brokers to
allow members to access nonemergency MaineCare-covered services.
C. "Transporter" means any entity, organization or individual that provides
transportation services reimbursable by a broker under the nonemergency
transportation program. This includes agents of the broker with which the broker has
entered a service agreement, public transportation, commercial taxis, volunteers and
friends and family.
2. Nonemergency transportation dashboard. The department shall post on a publicly
accessible website information relating to broker performance indicators and results. The
department shall post the following on a quarterly basis, and no later than 45 days following
the close of a fiscal quarter:
A. Broker contact information; and
B. Audited data from at least the 2 prior calendar years, including:
(1) The total number of trips by month and region;
(2) The number of trips sortable by mode of transportation, broker, month and year.
Mode of transportation must include trips by agency providers; trips by
commercial providers, volunteer drivers, contract taxis, ad hoc taxis and specialty
transit; trips in which the driver is the member or close associate; public transit;
and broker-provided trips;
(3) The total number of trips by trip destination;
(4) The number of complaints, categorized by type and sortable by month and
region;
(5) The total number of incidents by type; and
(6) A table, categorized by region, indicating whether the following performance
metrics have been met:
(a) All transporter and driver vehicles have a valid state motor vehicle
inspection sticker;
(b) The monthly member complaint rate does not exceed one complaint per
100 trips delivered;
(c) The call center call abandonment rate does not exceed 5%;
Page 1 - 132LR0575(01)

(d) Ninety percent of calls to the call center are directed to a live representative
within 60 seconds;
(e) No more than 1% of trips scheduled to be delivered are missed, not
including trips cancelled by the member or trips cancelled due to weather; and
(f) At least 85% of trips are on time, except that, for trips in which the member
being transported is a child under 16 years of age or is receiving services under
a home and community-based services waiver, the timeliness standard is 95%
of all trips delivered. A trip is considered on time if the driver arrives from 30
minutes before until 15 minutes after the scheduled pickup from the point of
origin, from 30 minutes before until 5 minutes after the scheduled drop-off
time at the MaineCare-covered service location and until 30 minutes after the
scheduled pickup from the MaineCare-covered service location. Trips to
methadone clinics for the purpose of dosing are considered on time if the
member arrives within the window of the clinic's operating hours and no later
than 30 minutes prior to the clinic's closing time for the day. Trips by members
using the mileage reimbursement option or public transit are considered on
time for all trips for the purpose of date reporting. Trips by facilities under
contract with the broker to provide transportation for their members are
considered on time for all trips for the purpose of data reporting.
3. Incident reporting. The department shall track incidents by region, categorize
incidents and issue a monthly report with the following:
A. Incidents requiring immediate attention, including any incident involving injury
requiring medical care or emergency services; accidents resulting in injury or death;
evidence of a weapon; assaults; incidents requiring police assistance; harassment;
illegal activities by the member, driver or escort; other serious safety concerns; and
incidents related to a minor or to a person over the age of 65. These incidents must be
reported to the department within one business day of the incident;
B. Incidents not requiring immediate attention, including accidents without injury;
wheelchair tie-down issues that have not caused injury; and repeated issues with drivers
and disruptions that do not cause danger but result in service delays. These incidents
must be reported to the department by the 15th day of the month following the prior
month's reporting period; and
C. Isolated incidents, including isolated late trips; vehicle cleanliness concerns;
member hygiene concerns; and vehicles or drivers incompatible with member needs.
These incidents must be reported to the department by the 15th day of the month
following the prior month's reporting period.
4. Corrective action plans. The department shall issue a corrective action plan to a
broker who has failed to meet the same performance metric for 3 consecutive months. The
corrective action plan must include a root cause analysis regarding the reasons for the
deficiency, a timeline with a completion date for when the broker is expected to achieve
compliance and a description of the actions taken and the results of these actions. A
corrective action plan issued by the department to a broker must be made available on the
department's publicly available website.
Page 2 - 132LR0575(01)

5. Surveys. Beginning July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, each broker shall conduct
annual member surveys to assess transporter and broker services. Results must be provided
to the department and published on the department's publicly available website by
November 15th of each year.
6. Report. The department shall provide a report by December 31, 2025, and annually
thereafter, to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health
and human services matters demonstrating compliance with this section and demonstrating
that broker performance requirements have been met or, if requirements have not been met,
outlining defects or failures to meet requirements and expectations for corrective actions
to remedy those defects or failures.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3198 is enacted to read:
§3198. Nonemergency transportation advisory committees
1. Advisory committees. The department shall establish a nonemergency
transportation advisory committee in each region to provide the department with
recommendations regarding the performance of nonemergency transportation services in
that region.
2. Membership. A nonemergency transportation advisory committee under this
section must consist of the following members, appointed by the commissioner or the
commissioner's designee:
A. At least 2 members who receive nonemergency transportation services and who
reside in the region;
B. At least one representative of each federally recognized Indian tribe in the region;
C. At least one representative from a behavioral health facility operating in the region;
D. At least one representative from an opioid treatment program operating in the
region;
E. A representative of a home and community-based services provider;
F. At least one representative from each transporter under a service agreement with the
region's broker;
G. At least one representative from each public transportation provider that provides
services to members in the region;
H. At least one representative of a taxi company;
I. If volunteer drivers are used in the region, at least one active volunteer driver;
J. A representative of the department;
K. At least one representative of a provider of services for persons with disabilities;
L. At least one representative of a provider of services for immigrants and refugees, if
such a provider is available in the region;
M. At least one representative from each of the federally qualified health centers in
the region; and
N. At least one representative from each of the hospitals in the region.
Page 3 - 132LR0575(01)

3. Meetings and notice. A nonemergency transportation advisory committee must
meet at least once every 6 months and must provide notice of meetings at least 30 days in
advance of any scheduled meeting.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3199 is enacted to read:
§3199. Nonemergency transportation ombudsman program
1. Program established. The nonemergency transportation ombudsman program,
referred to in this section as "the program," is established as an independent program within
the Executive Department to provide ombudsman services to MaineCare members
regarding MaineCare nonemergency transportation provided by the department. The
primary duty of the ombudsman is to ensure that all complaints and concerns related to
MaineCare nonemergency transportation are investigated and recommendations for
appropriate redress are made in a timely fashion.
2. Contracts. The program shall operate by contract between the department and a
nonprofit organization that the Executive Department determines to be free of potential
conflict of interest and best able to provide the ombudsman services on a statewide basis.
The contract must be for a term of one initial year, followed by renewals for up to 4
additional years. The ombudsman may not be actively involved in state-level political
party activities or publicly endorse, solicit funds for or make contributions to political
parties on the state level or candidates for statewide elective office. The ombudsman may
not be a candidate for or hold any statewide elected public office.
3. Duties. The program shall:
A. Consider and promote the best interests of MaineCare members and investigate,
advise on and work toward resolution of complaints of infringement of the rights of
members;
B. Establish a comprehensive outreach program regarding the services offered by the
ombudsman, including outreach and education to MaineCare members and 3rd parties
that provide services or support to MaineCare members, including health care
providers, social service providers and health insurance navigators, brokers, agents and
other enrollment professionals;
C. Provide information regarding the services available through the ombudsman
program to all MaineCare members;
D. Maintain a toll-free telephone number, to be advertised on the department's publicly
accessible website and in the MaineCare member handbook;
E. Answer inquiries within 10 business days of receipt, investigate and resolve
complaints regarding the performance and services of the department and provide
monthly updates to MaineCare members regarding the status of outstanding complaints
and concerns;
F. Analyze and provide opinions and recommendations to agencies, the Governor and
the Legislature on state programs, rules, policies and laws;
G. Determine what types of complaints and inquiries are accepted for action by the
program and adopt procedures regarding communication with MaineCare members
making inquiries or complaints to the department;
Page 4 - 132LR0575(01)

H. Apply for and use grants, gifts and funds for the purpose of performing the duties
of the program; and
I. Collect and analyze records and data relevant to the duties and activities of the
program and make reports as required by law or as the department considers
appropriate.
4. Confidentiality of records. Information held by or records or case-specific reports
maintained by the program are confidential. Disclosure may be made only if the
ombudsman determines such disclosure is lawful and in the best interest of the MaineCare
member who is the subject of the records. The awarded contractor shall enter into a
business associate agreement with the department. The program may not make public the
identity of any individual requesting assistance from the program or make public any
protected health information in the conduct of its duties.
5. Liability. Any person who in good faith submits a complaint or inquiry to the
program pursuant to this section is immune from any civil or criminal liability for that act.
For the purpose of any civil or criminal proceedings, there is a rebuttable presumption that
any person acting pursuant to this section did so in good faith. The ombudsman and
employees and volunteers in the program are deemed employees of the State for the
purposes of the Maine Tort Claims Act.
6. Report. The program shall provide a report by December 31, 2025 and annually
thereafter concurrently to the department and to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters describing the
activities and services of the program, priorities set by the program, waiting lists for
services, provision of outreach services and recommendations for changes in statute or
rules to improve the provision of MaineCare transportation services.